src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"d:0 before s:c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
d:0 <=>	_ %> [ c ]  ;
 %^Red12323:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) _ Vow: [ Lts | » ]* ; ! see Cns:0 in reduplication 3 and 5
!d:0 <=>	_ %> [ s: #| c ]  ;
!!!€ ʔu%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>c
!!!€ ʔu000000kʷəda0%>c
!!€ ʔu%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>cid
!!€ ʔu000000kʷəda0%>cid

"d:t before ə b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
d:t <=>	[ə:|»|i:|a:|u:] _ %^Pen: %^RmVOW: %^d2t: %> ə b  ;
!echo 'b ə q̓ ə:0 d:t ^Pen:0 ^RmVOW:0 ^d2t:0 > ə b' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'bəq̓əd+V+Pass' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
!!€ bəq̓əd^Pen^RmVOW^d2t>əb
!!€ bəq̓0t000>əb



"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^RedPL130130:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: (Vow:) Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š  ɬ ƛ̕  k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ  x̌ x̌ʷ ) ;
!!2017-11-27where Cx in (p b t t̕ d dᶻ č š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ w w̓ y̓ k̓ʷ gʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;

"%{p3%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p3%}:Cx <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^RedPL130130:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cx (Vow:) Cns [ Lts | » ]* ;
               %^Red12323:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cx: Vow: Cns [ Lts | » ]* ;
               [ %^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cx Vow: Cns [ Lts | » ]* ;
               [ %^Red1i123:|%^Red12123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: _%{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cx Vow Cns [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕  y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!2019-03-04           where Cx in (p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;

"%{p6%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p6%}:Cx <=>
              %^RedPL1i1i13:  _ %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:)  Cx Vow: Cns [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕  y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!2019-03-04           where Cx in (p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!! sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl bear
!!€ s%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd%^RedPL1i1i13
!!€ s%^√čičič0txʷəd0

!! liquids

"%{p1%}:l̕ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:l̕ <=> %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [q|y] Vow: l [ Lts | » ]* ;
             %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: l̕ [ Lts | » ]* ;

"%{p1%}:y̓ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:y̓ <=> %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) q Vow: y [ Lts | » ]* ;
              %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: y̓ [ Lts | » ]* ;



"%{p1%}:w̓ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:w̓ <=> %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) q Vow: w [ Lts | » ]* ;
             %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: w̓ [ Lts | » ]* ;

"%{p1%}:ʔ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:ʔ <=> %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) s Vow: q̓ʷ [ Lts | » ]* ;
             %^RedPL123123:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: ʔ [ Lts | » ]* ;
             [%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: Cns: [ Lts | » ]* ;

!! x̌aʔx̌aʔ+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg: **sacred/pyhä**
!!€ {p5}{p4}{p3}̌{p2}{p1}x̌aʔx̌aʔ^Red1iq123
!!€ 00x̌iqx̌aʔx̌aʔ0

"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %^RedPL123123: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - [q|y]] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
  %^Red12323: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (l) ;
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0
	   
"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %^RedPL123123: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - q] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
   %^Red12323: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (y w) ;

"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %^RedPL123123: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - s] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
  %^Red12323: %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* ;
           where Cx in (q̓ʷ) ;

"Cns:0 in reduplication 3 and 5"
!! **@RULENAME@**
CnsNoGlotOrD:0 <=> %^Red12323:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) _ Vow: Cns: [ Lts | » ]* ;
!{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}ʔaciɬtalbixʷ^Red12323
!00ʔac0aciɬtalbixʷ0


!"Disallow full vowel removal with Red1iq13 type of reduplication"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
!13:0 /<=
!  %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns [a: | á: | à: | i: | í: | ì: | u: | ú: | ù:]  [ Lts | » ]* _ [ %> | # ]; ! full vowel not lost
!  where 13 in (%^RedPL1i1i13 %^Red1i13 %^Red12q13 %^Red1iq13 %^RedPL130130);



!!TESTS
!echo 's ^√:0 {p5}:č {p4}:i {p3}:č {p2}:i {p1}:0 ^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:0 č ə:0 t xʷ ə d' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'sčətxʷəd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
